Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 79.24 RCW to read as follows:Washington state law enforcement officers ruled as dying in the line of duty under the hometown heroes survivors benefits act of 2003, as determined by the United States department of justice, shall be included on the Washington state law enforcement memorial.(1) This section applies retroactively for five years to include Washington state law enforcement officers who died in the line of duty on or after January 1, 2020.(2) Once a determination is made pursuant to the hometown heroes survivors benefits act of 2003, the officer's name shall be added to the Washington state law enforcement memorial at the first wall update following the determination.--- END ---